Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB255.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 532 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In all non-felony cases, the jury in its initial verdict shall make a determination of
not guilty, guilty, guilty but mentally ill, or not guilty by reason of insanity.
(2) Upon return of a verdict of guilty or guilty but mentally ill, the court shall
conduct a sentencing hearing before the jury, if the case was tried before a jury.
In the hearing, the jury will determine the punishment to be imposed pursuant to
KRS 532.090. The jury shall recommend whether the sentences shall be served
concurrently or consecutively.
(3) (a) Evidence may be offered by the Commonwealth relevant to sentencing
including the:
1. Defendant's prior convictions, both felony and misdemeanor;
2. Nature of prior offenses for which the defendant was convicted;
3. Date of the commission, sentencing, and release from confinement or
supervision from all prior offenses;
4. Maximum expiration of sentence as determined by the division of
probation and parole for all current and prior offenses;
5. Defendant's status if on probation, parole, postincarceration
supervision, conditional discharge, or any other form of legal release;
and
6. Impact of the crime upon the victim or victims, as defined in KRS
421.500, including a description of the nature and extent of any
physical, psychological, or financial harm suffered by the victim or
victims.
(b) The defendant may introduce evidence in mitigation or support of leniency.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1577
(c) Upon conclusion of the evidence, the court shall instruct the jury on the
range of punishment, and counsel for the defendant may present arguments
followed by counsel for the Commonwealth. The jury shall then retire and
recommend a sentence for the defendant.
(4) If the jury reports to the judge that it is unable to agree as to the sentence or any
portion of the sentence, the judge shall impose the sentence pursuant to KRS
532.090.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/8/2026 11:59 AM Jacketed